Utah statutes.
75-1-308.   Appeals.

Appellate review, including the right to appellate review, interlocutory appeal, provisions as to time, manner, notice, appeal bond, stays, scope of review, record on appeal, briefs, arguments and power of the appellate court, is governed by the rules applicable to the appeals to the Supreme Court in equity cases from the court of general jurisdiction, except that in proceedings where jury trial has been had as a matter of right, the rules applicable to the scope of review in jury cases apply.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

